Hawaii, session 2026, HB2405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that hospitality workers frequently work in isolated conditions, placing the workers at increased risk of harassment and assault. Media reports have documented cases in which workers were targeted due to a lack of adequate protections.  In 2019, the State of Washington enacted legislation to address these concerns, including by requiring employers in the hospitality industry to equip certain vulnerable workers with panic buttons. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to implement similar protections for hospitality workers in Hawaii. SECTION 2.  Chapter 486K, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§486K-    Safety of workers; panic buttons; training.  (a) Each hotelkeeper shall supply a panic button and provide annual training on the proper use and limitations of the panic button to each hospitality worker who works in guest rooms, restrooms, or other isolated conditions.  The panic button shall be portable and shall: (1)  Immediately summon assistance from a security guard, another worker, or a supervising employer; and (2)  Be designed to function effectively in the worker's physical environment. (b)  For the purposes of this section: "Hospitality worker" means an individual employed by a hotelkeeper or by a person or entity licensed in the State to operate a hotel or similar lodging, to: (1)  Clean guest rooms or restrooms; (2)  Deliver meals to private rooms; or (3)  Perform maintenance or front desk operations. "Panic button" means a portable emergency communication device that allows a hospitality worker to immediately summon on-site assistance if the worker reasonably believes they are in danger." SECTION 3.  The department of labor and industrial relations shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to effectuate the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that all hotelkeepers shall be in compliance with this Act no later than January 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________